Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB849.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Approval" means a permit, license, certification, registration, or any other
form of authorization that a regulated party is required to obtain from an
administrative body prior to engaging in a particular activity;
(b) "High-impact approval" means any approval that:
1. Has an average processing duration of ten (10) or more days and for
which more than one hundred (100) applications are received
annually;
2. Has an average processing time exceeding thirty (30) days; or
3. Is reasonably expected to generate investment in the Commonwealth
exceeding one million dollars ($1,000,000); and
(c) "Procedural stage" means a distinct step in the approval process at which
an application is transferred or reviewed.
(2) The Legislative Research Commission, in coordination with the Commonwealth
Office of Technology, shall develop, implement, and maintain a publicly
accessible online permit transparency portal to track permits, licenses,
certifications, registrations, and other forms of approval required by
administrative bodies in administrative regulations.
(3) The permit transparency portal shall include:
(a) A searchable database of all approval types offered by administrative bodies,
including:
1. A description of each approval;
2. The legal basis for each approval;
Page 1 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
3. Application requirements and forms;
4. Associated fees;
5. Expected processing timelines; and
6. Contact information for responsible units or personnel at each
procedural stage of the approval process;
(b) The ability for applicants to:
1. Submit applications and supporting documentation electronically;
2. Track the status of their applications through each procedural stage;
3. Receive automated notifications of approaching or missed deadlines;
and
4. Pay fees electronically; and
(c) Performance metrics, including:
1. Historical data on administrative body performance;
2. Average processing times;
3. Compliance with established timelines; and
4. A publicly available dashboard displaying aggregated data on
approval processing by administrative bodies.
(4) (a) Within twelve (12) months after the effective date of this Act, the permit
transparency portal shall be launched in a pilot phase that includes at least
three (3) administrative bodies with high-impact approvals.
(b) Within twenty-four (24) months after the effective date of this Act, the portal
shall be fully implemented for all administrative bodies.
(5) Each administrative body shall:
(a) Conduct a comprehensive permit audit within one hundred eighty (180)
days after the effective date of this Act, identifying:
1. All approvals it issues;
2. Average processing times;
Page 2 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
3. Opportunities for consolidation or elimination; and
4. Process improvement recommendations;
(b) Cooperate with implementation of the portal;
(c) Within ten (10) business days of receiving an application, notify the
applicant whether the application is complete or incomplete, specifying any
deficiencies; and
(d) Accept electronic submissions of applications where practicable.
(6) The Legislative Research Commission shall prepare and submit to the General
Assembly by February 1 of each year an annual permit efficiency report that
includes:
(a) Statistics on approvals processed, approved, and denied;
(b) Average processing times by approval type;
(c) Compliance with established timelines;
(d) Analysis of delays and recommendations for improvement; and
(e) Year-over-year trends in processing efficiency.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Discretionary requirement" means a regulatory requirement that is not
mandated by federal law, federal regulation, or Kentucky statute, but is
issued at the administrative body's discretion;
(b) "Regulatory requirement" means any action required to be taken, condition
required to be met, or information required to be provided pursuant to an
administrative regulation in order to:
1. Access government services;
2. Obtain an approval as defined in Section 1 of this Act;
3. Operate or conduct business in the Commonwealth; or
Page 3 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
4. Otherwise comply with the administrative regulation; and
(c) "Regulatory restriction" means any use of the terms "shall," "shall not,"
"prohibited," "required," or other mandatory or prohibitory language
within an administrative regulation that imposes an obligation or constraint
upon a regulated party.
(2) (a) Within one hundred eighty (180) days after the effective date of this Act,
each administrative body shall submit to the Legislative Research
Commission a regulatory inventory report that includes:
1. A count of all regulatory requirements contained in the administrative
body's administrative regulations;
2. A count of all regulatory restrictions contained in the administrative
body's administrative regulations;
3. Identification of which requirements are discretionary requirements
and which are mandated by federal or state law;
4. The methodology used to conduct the count; and
5. A certification by the head of the administrative body that the
inventory is accurate.
(b) The Legislative Research Commission shall:
1. Compile the inventories submitted under paragraph (a) of this
subsection into a comprehensive statewide regulatory baseline;
2. Publish the statewide regulatory baseline on a publicly accessible
website within thirty (30) days of receiving all administrative body
submissions;
3. Establish uniform counting methodologies and definitions to ensure
consistency across administrative bodies; and
4. Update the baseline inventory annually to track changes in the total
number of regulatory requirements and restrictions.
Page 4 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
(3) (a) Beginning February 1 of the year following establishment of the baseline,
and annually thereafter, each administrative body shall submit to the
Legislative Research Commission an updated count of its regulatory
requirements and restrictions.
(b) The Legislative Research Commission shall include in its annual report to
the General Assembly under Section 1 of this Act:
1. The statewide total of regulatory requirements and restrictions;
2. Year-over-year changes in regulatory requirements and restrictions,
sorted by administrative body;
3. Net additions and reductions since the baseline was established; and
4. Identification of administrative bodies with the largest increases or
decreases in regulatory requirements.
(4) The requirements of this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any
other inventory or reporting requirements established by this chapter.
Section 3. KRS 13A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Administrative body" means each state board, bureau, cabinet, commission,
department, authority, officer, or other entity, except the General Assembly and the
Court of Justice, authorized by law to promulgate administrative regulations;
(2) "Administrative regulation" means each statement of general applicability
promulgated by an administrative body that implements, interprets, or prescribes
law or policy, or describes the organization, procedure, or practice requirements of
any administrative body. The term includes an existing administrative regulation, a
new administrative regulation, an emergency administrative regulation, an
administrative regulation in contemplation of a statute, and the amendment or
repeal of an existing administrative regulation, but does not include:
(a) Statements concerning only the internal management of an administrative
Page 5 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
body and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the public;
(b) Declaratory rulings;
(c) Intradepartmental memoranda not in conflict with KRS 13A.130;
(d) Statements relating to acquisition of property for highway purposes and
statements relating to the construction or maintenance of highways; or
(e) Rules, regulations, and policies of the governing boards of institutions that
make up the postsecondary education system defined in KRS 164.001
pertaining to students attending or applicants to the institutions, to faculty and
staff of the respective institutions, or to the control and maintenance of land
and buildings occupied by the respective institutions;
(3) "Adopted" means that an administrative regulation has become effective in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter;
(4) "Authorizing signature" means the signature of the head of the administrative body
authorized by statute to promulgate administrative regulations;
(5) "Commission" means the Legislative Research Commission;
(6) "Effective" means an administrative regulation that has completed the legislative
committee review established by KRS 13A.290, 13A.330, and 13A.331;
(7) "Federal mandate" means any federal constitutional, legislative, or executive law or
order that requires or permits any administrative body to engage in regulatory
activities that impose compliance standards, reporting requirements, recordkeeping,
or similar responsibilities upon entities in the Commonwealth;
(8) "Federal mandate comparison" means a written statement containing the
information required by KRS 13A.245;
(9) "Filed" or "promulgated" means that an administrative regulation, or other
document required to be filed by this chapter, has been submitted to the
Commission in accordance with this chapter;
(10) "Full review" means that a filed administrative regulation is on an agenda for:
Page 6 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
(a) The subcommittee as the last step required by this chapter prior to assignment
in accordance with KRS 13A.290(6);
(b) A legislative committee as the last step required by this chapter for an
ordinary administrative regulation before becoming effective upon
adjournment in accordance with KRS 13A.331(1) and (2); or
(c) A legislative committee as an emergency administrative regulation being
reviewed after assignment in accordance with KRS 13A.290(6) and (7);
(11) "Last effective date" means the latter of:
(a) The most recent date an ordinary administrative regulation became effective,
without including the date a technical amendment was made pursuant to KRS
13A.040(10), 13A.2255(2), or 13A.312; or
(b) The date a certification letter was filed with the regulations compiler for that
administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.3104(4), if the letter stated
that the administrative regulation shall remain in effect without amendment;
(12) "Legislative committee" means an interim joint committee, a House or Senate
standing committee, a statutory committee, or a subcommittee of the Legislative
Research Commission;
(13) "Local government" means and includes a city, county, urban-county, charter
county, consolidated local government, special district, or a quasi-governmental
body authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes or a local ordinance;
(14) "Major economic impact" means the combined implementation and compliance
costs of an administrative regulation are at least five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) over any two (2) year period;
(15) "Proposed administrative regulation" means an administrative regulation that:
(a) Has been filed by an administrative body; and
(b) Has not become effective or been withdrawn;
(16) "Regulatory impact analysis" means a written statement containing the provisions
Page 7 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
required by KRS 13A.240;
(17) "Signature" means the application of letters or numbers that signify the intent to
sign, are uniquely linked to the signer, and are:
(a) Produced by manual or handwritten means;
(b) An image of the manual or handwritten signature produced under paragraph
(a) of this subsection; or
(c) Produced by using a digital signature scheme or electronic confirmation
method that allows for verification of authenticity;
(18) "Small business" means a business entity, including its affiliates, that:
(a) Is independently owned and operated; and
(b) 1. Employs fewer than one hundred fifty (150) full-time employees or their
equivalent; or
2. Has gross annual sales of less than six million dollars ($6,000,000);
(19) "Statement of consideration" means the document required by KRS 13A.280 in
which the administrative body summarizes the comments received, its responses to
those comments, and the action taken, if any, as a result of those comments and
responses;
(20) "Subcommittee" means the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee of the
Legislative Research Commission;
(21) "Tiering" means the tailoring of regulatory requirements to fit the particular
circumstances surrounding regulated entities;[ and]
(22) "Transparent economic impact analysis" means a detailed analysis conducted by
the Legislative Research Commission that:
(a) Evaluates both fiscal costs and economic impacts of proposed and existing
administrative regulations;
(b) Uses publicly disclosed methodologies and data sources;
(c) Allows for independent verification of conclusions;
Page 8 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
(d) Includes comparison with the administrative body's submitted analysis; and
(e) Is published on a publicly accessible website with all supporting data and
calculations; and
(23) "Written comments" means comments submitted to the administrative body's
contact person identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d) via hand delivery, United
States mail, email, or facsimile and may include but is not limited to comments
submitted internally from within the promulgating administrative body or from
another administrative body.
Section 4. KRS 13A.020 (Effective until January 1, 2027) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is hereby created a permanent subcommittee of the Legislative Research
Commission to be known as the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee.
The subcommittee shall be composed of eight (8) members appointed as follows:
three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the President; one (1) member of the
minority party in the Senate appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the Senate;
three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives; and one (1) member of the minority party in the House
of Representatives appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the House of
Representatives. The members of the subcommittee shall serve for terms of two (2)
years, and the members appointed from each chamber shall elect one (1) member
from their chamber to serve as co-chair. Any vacancy that may occur in the
membership of the subcommittee shall be filled by the same appointing authority
who made the original appointment.
(2) On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the monthly
meeting date. A monthly meeting may be rescheduled by agreement of both co-
chairs. The co-chairs shall have joint responsibilities for subcommittee meeting
agendas and presiding at subcommittee meetings. The members of the
Page 9 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
subcommittee shall be compensated for attending meetings, as provided in KRS
7.090(3).
(3) Any professional, clerical, or other employees required by the subcommittee shall
be provided in accordance with the provisions of KRS 7.090(4) and (5).
(4) A majority of the entire membership of the Administrative Regulation Review
Subcommittee shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the subcommittee shall
be by vote of a majority of its entire membership.
(5) The subcommittee's primary functions shall be advisory and analytical, focused
on:
(a) Conducting transparent economic impact analyses of proposed and existing
administrative regulations;
(b) Identifying administrative regulations for potential review by the General
Assembly;
(c) Recommending regulatory improvements to enhance efficiency and reduce
unnecessary burdens; and
(d) Reporting findings and recommendations to the General Assembly for
legislative action.
Section 5. KRS 13A.020 (Effective January 1, 2027) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) (a) There is hereby created a permanent subcommittee of the Legislative
Research Commission to be known as the Administrative Regulation Review
Subcommittee.
(b) The subcommittee shall be composed of eight (8) members appointed in
January of each odd-numbered year as follows: three (3) members of the
Senate appointed by the President; one (1) member of the minority party in
the Senate appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the Senate; three (3)
members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the
Page 10 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
House of Representatives; and one (1) member of the minority party in the
House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the
House of Representatives. The members of the subcommittee shall serve for
terms of two (2) years, and the President of the Senate and Speaker of the
House of Representatives shall each appoint one (1) member of the
subcommittee from their chamber to serve as co-chair.
(c) Any vacancy that may occur in the membership of the subcommittee shall be
filled within thirty (30) days of the occurrence, in the same manner as the
original appointment, and for the balance of the vacated member's term.
(2) On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the monthly
meeting date. A monthly meeting may be rescheduled by agreement of both co-
chairs. The co-chairs shall have joint responsibilities for subcommittee meeting
agendas and presiding at subcommittee meetings. The members of the
subcommittee shall be compensated for attending meetings, as provided in KRS
7.090(3).
(3) Any professional, clerical, or other employees required by the subcommittee shall
be provided in accordance with the provisions of KRS 7.090(4) and (5).
(4) A majority of the entire membership of the Administrative Regulation Review
Subcommittee shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the subcommittee shall
be by vote of a majority of its entire membership.
(5) The subcommittee's primary functions shall be advisory and analytical, focused
on:
(a) Conducting transparent economic impact analyses of proposed and existing
administrative regulations;
(b) Identifying administrative regulations for potential review by the General
Assembly;
(c) Recommending regulatory improvements to enhance efficiency and reduce
Page 11 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
unnecessary burdens; and
(d) Reporting findings and recommendations to the General Assembly for
legislative action.
Section 6. KRS 13A.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall:
(a) Conduct a continuous study as to whether additional legislation or changes in
legislation are needed based on various factors, including but not limited to
review of new, emergency, and existing administrative regulations, the lack of
administrative regulations, and the needs of administrative bodies;
(b) Except as provided by KRS 158.6471 and 158.6472, review and comment
upon effective administrative regulations pursuant to subsections (2), (3), and
(4) of this section or administrative regulations filed with the Commission;
(c) Make recommendations for changes in statutes, new statutes, repeal of
statutes affecting administrative regulations or the ability of administrative
bodies to promulgate them;[ and]
(d) Conduct such other studies relating to administrative regulations as may be
assigned by the Commission; and
(e) Prepare and submit a report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker
of the House of Representatives, who shall assign the report to appropriate
legislative committees for review, on the first day of each regular session.
The report shall identify:
1. All administrative regulations with a major economic impact that
warrant legislative review;
2. Administrative regulations where the subcommittee's economic impact
analysis differs significantly from the administrative body's analysis;
3. Recommendations for regulatory streamlining and consolidation; and
4. Priority administrative regulations for potential legislative action.
Page 12 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
(2) The subcommittee may make a determination:
(a) That an effective administrative regulation or an administrative regulation
filed with the Commission is deficient because it:
1. Is wrongfully promulgated;
2. Appears to be in conflict with an existing statute;
3. Appears to have no statutory authority for its promulgation;
4. Appears to impose stricter or more burdensome state requirements than
required by the federal mandate, without reasonable justification;
5. Fails to use tiering when tiering is applicable;
6. Is in excess of the administrative body's authority;
7. Appears to impose an unreasonable burden on government or small
business, or both;
8. Is filed as an emergency administrative regulation without adequate
justification of the emergency nature of the situation as described in
KRS 13A.190(1);
9. Has not been noticed in conformance with the requirements of KRS
13A.270(3);
10. Does not provide an adequate cost analysis pursuant to KRS 13A.250;
11. Violates KRS 13A.105;
12. Was the subject of the subcommittee's instruction to an administrative
body to appear under subsection (4) of this section and the
administrative body failed to:
a. Appear;
b. Make a good-faith effort to answer subcommittee questions; or
c. Provide any information or data required by the subcommittee; or
13. Appears to be deficient in any other manner;
(b) That an administrative regulation is needed to implement an existing statute;
Page 13 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
or
(c) That an administrative regulation should be amended or repealed.
(3) The subcommittee may conduct an informational review of an effective
administrative regulation or an administrative regulation filed with the Commission
if requested by a member of the subcommittee.
(4) (a) The subcommittee may require any administrative body to appear before it to
answer questions or submit data and information as required by the
subcommittee in the performance of its duties under this chapter, and no
administrative body shall fail to:
1. Appear before the subcommittee;
2. Make a good-faith effort to answer subcommittee questions;
3. Provide any information or data required by the subcommittee; or
4. Perform any combination of subparagraphs 1., 2., and 3. of this
paragraph required by the subcommittee.
(b) Either co-chair of the subcommittee may require action by an administrative
body under paragraph (a) of this subsection on behalf of the subcommittee.
(5) At least five (5) calendar days before an informational review of an ordinary
administrative regulation, the subcommittee shall notify the affected administrative
body.
(6) Any determination or finding made under subsection (2) of this section shall be
advisory in nature and shall be included in the subcommittee's report to the
General Assembly for consideration and potential legislative action. The
subcommittee's findings shall not prevent an administrative regulation from
becoming effective, but shall inform the General Assembly's oversight and
potential future legislative action.
SECTION 7. KRS 13A.105 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
Page 14 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any administrative regulation
that will have a major economic impact as defined in Section 3 of this Act shall
not take effect before the General Assembly enacts a law ratifying the
administrative regulation.
(2) (a) If the General Assembly is not in session and the Governor believes an
ordinary administrative regulation must go into effect before the next
session, the Governor may call an extraordinary session for the purpose of
voting to approve or disapprove the proposed administrative regulation.
(b) If the Governor calls an extraordinary session as authorized by paragraph
(a) of this subsection, the General Assembly shall work in good faith to
promptly schedule the necessary votes.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an emergency administrative
regulation as described in KRS 13A.190 that will have a major economic impact
may take effect before the General Assembly enacts a law ratifying the
administrative regulation if the Governor publishes a statement with the
administrative regulation explaining why:
(a) 1. An emergency exists that requires the administrative regulation to take
effect immediately; or
2. A federal requirement or federal funding requires the administrative
regulation to take effect immediately;
(b) The General Assembly cannot be called back into an extraordinary session
to consider and vote on the administrative regulation; and
(c) The administrative regulation:
1. Otherwise complies with emergency powers statutes and limitations;
or
2. Is required by federal law or for federal funding.
Section 8. KRS 13A.250 is amended to read as follows:
Page 15 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
(1) An administrative body that promulgates an administrative regulation shall consider
the cost that the administrative regulation may cause state or local government and
regulated entities to incur.
(2) (a) A two (2) part cost analysis shall be completed for each administrative
regulation.
(b) The first part of the cost analysis shall include the projected cost or cost
savings to the Commonwealth of Kentucky and each of its affected agencies,
and the projected cost or cost savings to affected local governments, including
cities, counties, fire departments, and school districts.
(c) The second part of the cost analysis shall include the projected cost or cost
savings to the regulated entities affected by the administrative regulation.
(d) Agencies or entities affected by the administrative regulation may submit
comments in accordance with KRS 13A.270(1) to the promulgating
administrative body or to a legislative committee reviewing the administrative
regulation.
(3) Each administrative body that promulgates an administrative regulation shall
prepare and submit with the administrative regulation a fiscal note. The fiscal note
shall state:
(a) The number of the administrative regulation;
(b) The name, email address, and telephone number of the contact person of the
administrative body identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d), and, if
applicable, the name, email address, and telephone number of an alternate
person to be contacted with specific questions about the fiscal note;
(c) Each unit, part, or division of state or local government the administrative
regulation will affect;
(d) Whether the administrative regulation was expressly authorized by an act of
the General Assembly, and if so, identification of the act;
Page 16 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
(e) In detail, the aspect or service of state or local government to which the
administrative regulation relates, including identification of the applicable
state or federal statute or regulation that mandates the aspect or service or
authorizes the action taken by the administrative regulation;
(f) The estimated effect of the administrative regulation on the expenditures and
revenues of a state or local government agency or regulated entity for the first
full year the administrative regulation will be in effect and any subsequent
year the administrative regulation will be in effect. The administrative body
shall provide a narrative to explain the fiscal impact of the administrative
regulation and the methodology and resources it used to determine the fiscal
impact; and
(g) 1. The conclusion of the promulgating administrative body as to whether
the administrative regulation will have a major economic impact on state
and local government and regulated entities for the first full year the
administrative regulation will be in effect and for subsequent years if
different; and
2. An explanation of the methodology and resources used by the
administrative body to reach this conclusion.
(4) If an administrative body files an amendment to an administrative regulation
pursuant to KRS 13A.320(3) for a legislative committee meeting, the administrative
body shall:
(a) Consider the cost of the amendment as established in subsection (2) of this
section; and
(b) Prepare and submit a fiscal note as established in subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Any administrative body may request the advice and assistance of the Commission
in the preparation of the fiscal note.
Page 17 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
(6) The Commission shall review all fiscal notes submitted by all administrative
bodies, and may require any administrative body to submit background data upon
which the information required by subsection (3) of this section is based, and an
explanation of how the data was gathered.
Section 9. KRS 13A.290 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided by KRS 158.6471 and 158.6472, the Administrative
Regulation Review Subcommittee shall meet monthly to review
administrative regulations prior to close of business on the fifteenth day of the
calendar month.
(b) The agenda shall:
1. Include each administrative regulation that completed the public
comment process;
2. Include each administrative regulation for which a statement of
consideration was received on or before 12 noon, eastern time, on the
fifteenth day of the prior calendar month;
3. Include each effective administrative regulation or administrative
regulation filed with the Commission that the subcommittee has decided
to review pursuant to KRS 13A.030(3);
4. Include each administrative regulation required to be on the agenda
pursuant to KRS 13A.030(4);
5. Include each administrative regulation that was deferred from the prior
month's meeting of the subcommittee; and
6. Not include an administrative regulation that is deferred, withdrawn,
expired, or automatically taken off the agenda under the provisions of
this chapter, unless it is being reviewed pursuant to KRS 13A.030(3) or
(4).
(c) Review of an administrative regulation shall include the entire administrative
Page 18 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
regulation and all attachments filed with the administrative regulation. The
review of amendments to existing administrative regulations shall not be
limited to only the changes proposed by the promulgating administrative
body.
(2) The meetings shall be open to the public.
(3) Public notice of the time, date, and place of the Administrative Regulation Review
Subcommittee meeting shall be given in the Administrative Register.
(4) (a) A representative of the administrative body for an administrative regulation
on the agenda shall be present to explain the administrative regulation and to
answer questions thereon.
(b) If a representative of an administrative body with authority to amend, defer,
and answer questions about a filed ordinary or emergency administrative
regulation that is on the agenda for full review fails to appear before the
subcommittee, the subcommittee may:
1. Defer the administrative regulation to the next regularly scheduled
meeting of the subcommittee; and
2. Make a determination pursuant to KRS 13A.030(2), (3), and (4) or
13A.190(3).
(c) If a representative of an administrative body with authority to defer and
answer questions about an administrative regulation that was placed on the
agenda for informational review pursuant to KRS 13A.030(3) or (4) fails to
appear before the subcommittee, the subcommittee may:
1. Defer the informational review of the administrative regulation to the
next regularly scheduled meeting of the subcommittee; and
2. Make a determination pursuant to KRS 13A.030(2), (3), and (4) or
13A.190(3).
(5) Following the meeting and before the next regularly scheduled meeting of the
Page 19 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
Commission, the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall forward to
the Commission its findings, recommendations, or other comments it deems
appropriate in writing. The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee's
findings shall be published in the Administrative Register.
(6) (a) After review by the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee, the
Commission shall, on the first Wednesday of the following month, or if the
first Wednesday is a legal holiday, the next workday of the month:
1. Assign a filed administrative regulation to a legislative committee with
subject matter jurisdiction if the administrative regulation was on the
agenda for full review pursuant to subsection (1)(b)1., 2., or 5. of this
section; and
2. Not assign a filed administrative regulation to a legislative committee
with subject matter jurisdiction if the administrative regulation was
solely on the agenda for informational review pursuant to KRS
13A.030(3) or (4).
(b) Upon notification of the assignment by the Commission, the legislative
committee to which the administrative regulation is assigned shall notify the
regulations compiler:
1. Of the date, time, and place of the meeting at which it will consider the
administrative regulation; or
2. That it will not meet to consider the administrative regulation.
(7) (a) Within ninety (90) days of the assignment, the legislative committee may hold
a public meeting during which the administrative regulation shall be
reviewed.
(b) If the ninetieth day of the assignment falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday,
the deadline for review shall be the workday following the Saturday, Sunday,
or holiday.
Page 20 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
(c) 1. If the administrative regulation is assigned to an interim joint committee
and a session of the General Assembly begins during the review period,
the assignment shall transfer to the Senate and House standing
committees with subject matter jurisdiction.
2. If the administrative regulation is assigned to Senate and House standing
committees and a session of the General Assembly adjourns sine die
during the review period, the assignment shall transfer to the interim
joint committee with subject matter jurisdiction.
3. An administrative regulation may be transferred more than one (1) time
under this paragraph. A transfer shall not extend the review period
established by this subsection.
(d) Notice of the time, date, and place of the meeting shall be placed in the
legislative calendar.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, a legislative committee shall be
empowered to make the same determinations and to exercise the same authority as
the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee, including all powers and
restrictions relating to informational reviews conducted under KRS 13A.030(3) or
(4).
(9) (a) This subsection shall apply to ordinary and emergency administrative
regulations filed with the Commission and reviewed pursuant to subsection
(7) of this section.
(b) A majority of the entire membership of the legislative committee shall
constitute a quorum for purposes of reviewing administrative regulations.
(c) In order to amend an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.320,
defer an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.300, or find an
administrative regulation deficient pursuant to KRS 13A.030(2), (3), or (4) or
13A.190(3), the motion to amend, defer, or find deficient shall be approved by
Page 21 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
a majority of the entire membership of the legislative committee.
Additionally, during a session of the General Assembly, standing committees
of the Senate and House of Representatives shall agree in order to amend an
administrative regulation, defer an administrative regulation, or find an
administrative regulation deficient by:
1. Meeting separately; or
2. Meeting jointly. If the standing committees meet jointly, it shall require
a majority vote of Senate members voting and a majority of House
members voting, as well as the majority vote of the entire membership
of the standing committees meeting jointly, in order to take action on the
administrative regulation.
(10) (a) The quorum requirements of subsection (9)(b) of this section shall apply to an
effective or filed administrative regulation that is under informational review
by a legislative committee pursuant to subsection (8) of this section and KRS
13A.030(3) or (4).
(b) A motion to defer the informational review of an administrative regulation or
find the administrative regulation deficient shall be approved by:
1. A majority of the entire membership of the Administrative Regulation
Review Subcommittee; or
2. A legislative committee in accordance with subsection (9)(c) of this
section.
(11) (a) Upon adjournment of the meeting at which a legislative committee has
considered an administrative regulation pursuant to subsection (7) or (10) of
this section, the legislative committee shall inform the regulations compiler of
its findings, recommendations, or other action taken on the administrative
regulation.
(b) Following the meeting and before the next regularly scheduled meeting of the
Page 22 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
Commission, the legislative committee shall forward to the Commission its
findings, recommendations, or other comments it deems appropriate in
writing. The legislative committee's findings shall be published in the
Administrative Register.
(c) Upon adjournment of the meeting at which a legislative committee has
considered an administrative regulation pursuant to subsection (7) or (10)
of this section that will have a major economic impact pursuant to Section 7
of this Act, the legislative committee shall submit the administrative
regulation to the President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of
Representatives in accordance with Section 6 of this Act.
Section 10. KRS 13A.331 is amended to read as follows:
Except for administrative regulations that require the approval of the General
Assembly pursuant to Section 7 of this Act, a filed ordinary administrative regulation
that has not been deferred or found deficient and has been referred by the Commission to
a legislative committee shall be considered as adopted and shall become effective:
(1) Upon adjournment of a meeting of a legislative committee other than the
subcommittee if:
(a) The administrative regulation was on the meeting agenda; and
(b) A quorum was present;
(2) Upon adjournment of a meeting of a House or Senate standing committee if:
(a) The administrative regulation was on its meeting agenda;
(b) A quorum was present; and
(c) The administrative regulation has previously been on a meeting agenda of the
other standing committee when a quorum was present; or
(3) At the expiration of the review period established in KRS 13A.290(7), if within the
review period a legislative committee has failed to meet or failed to place a filed
administrative regulation on a meeting agenda.
Page 23 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
Section 11. KRS 171.450 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish:
(a) Procedures for the compilation and submission to the department of lists and
schedules of public records proposed for disposal;
(b) Procedures for the disposal or destruction of public records authorized for
disposal or destruction, including appropriate procedures to protect against
unauthorized access to or use of personal information as defined by KRS
61.931;
(c) Standards and procedures for recording, managing, and preserving public
records and for the reproduction of public records by photographic or
microphotographic process;[ and]
(d) Procedures for:
1. Collection and distribution by the central depository of all reports and
publications[, except the Kentucky Revised Statutes editions,] issued by
any department, board, commission, officer or other agency of the
Commonwealth for general public distribution after July 1, 1958; and
2. Establishing and maintaining within the central depository a
comprehensive inventory of all administrative regulations easily and
transparently available for public consumption, including information
on the statutory authority, purpose, economic impact, and review
history of each administrative regulation; and
(e) Standards and procedures to ensure that the central depository established
under paragraph (d) of this subsection is maintained in a machine-readable
format that enables systematic analysis, automated text processing, and
electronic search and retrieval of records contained in the central
depository.
(2) The department shall enforce the provisions of KRS 171.410 to 171.740 by
Page 24 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
appropriate rules and regulations.
(3) The department shall make copies of such rules and regulations available to all
officials affected by KRS 171.410 to 171.740 subject to the provisions of KRS
Chapter 13A.
(4) Such rules and regulations when approved by the department shall be binding on all
state and local agencies, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A. The
department shall perform any acts deemed necessary, legal and proper to carry out
the duties and responsibilities imposed upon it pursuant to the authority granted
herein.
(5) The department may contract with vendors providing advanced computing
services, including but not limited to software applications capable of automated
pattern recognition, text analysis, data processing, and artificial intelligence
systems, to assist in the compilation, maintenance, and analysis of records
contained in the central depository. Any contract authorized by this subsection
shall include provisions ensuring:
(a) Data security and protection consistent with state and federal requirements;
(b) State ownership and control of all data and records;
(c) Compliance with all applicable open records requirements; and
(d) Human review and approval of any outputs generated by advanced
computing services before these outputs are used to modify, dispose of, or
otherwise affect the status of public records.
Section 12. KRS 13A.040 is amended to read as follows:
The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall appoint an administrative
regulations compiler who shall:
(1) Receive administrative regulations, and other documents required to be filed by the
provisions of this chapter, tendered for filing;
(2) Stamp administrative regulations tendered for filing with the time and date of
Page 25 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
receipt;
(3) Provide administrative and support services to the subcommittee;
(4) Maintain a file of administrative regulations and other documents required to be
filed by this chapter, for public inspection, with suitable indexes;
(5) Maintain a file of ineffective administrative regulations;
(6) Maintain a file of material incorporated by reference, including superseded or
ineffective material incorporated by reference;
(7) Prepare the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service;
(8) Upon request, certify copies of administrative regulations and other documents that
have been filed with the regulations compiler;
(9) Correct errors that do not change the substance of an administrative regulation,
including but not limited to typographical errors, errors in format, and grammatical
errors;
(10) (a) Change the following items in an administrative regulation in response to a
specific written request for a technical amendment submitted by the
administrative body if the regulations compiler determines that the requested
changes do not affect the scope or substance of the administrative regulation
and the changes are provided in accordance with KRS 13A.312(3):
1. The administrative body's identifying information, including address,
phone number, fax number, website address, and email address;
2. Typographical errors, errors in format, and grammatical errors;
3. Citations to statutes or other administrative regulations if a format
change within that statute or administrative regulation has changed the
numbering or lettering of parts; or
4. Other changes in accordance with KRS 13A.312; and
(b) Notify the administrative body within thirty (30) business days of receipt of a
technical amendment letter the status of the request, including:
Page 26 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
1. Any requested changes that are accepted as technical amendments; and
2. Any requested changes that are not accepted as technical amendments;
(11) Refuse to accept for filing administrative regulations, and other documents required
to be filed by this chapter, that do not conform to the drafting, formatting, or filing
requirements established by the provisions of KRS[ 13A.105,] 13A.190(5) to (11),
13A.220, 13A.222(1), (2), and (3), 13A.230, 13A.280, 13A.312, and 13A.320, and
notify the administrative body in writing of the reasons for refusing to accept an
administrative regulation for filing;
(12) Maintain a list of all administrative regulation numbers and the corresponding last
effective date, based on the information included in the history line of each
administrative regulation; and
(13) Perform other duties required by the Commission or by a legislative committee.
Section 13. KRS 13A.100 is amended to read as follows:
Subject to limitations in applicable statutes,[ including KRS 13A.105,] any administrative
body that is empowered to promulgate administrative regulations shall, by administrative
regulation, prescribe, consistent with applicable statutes:
(1) Each statement of general applicability, policy, procedure, memorandum, or other
form of action that implements; interprets; prescribes law or policy; describes the
organization, procedure, or practice requirements of any administrative body; or
affects private rights or procedures available to the public;
(2) The process for application for license, benefits available or other matters for which
an application would be appropriate unless such process is prescribed by a statute;
(3) Fees, except for those exempted in paragraphs (a) to (j) of this subsection, to be
charged by the administrative body if such fees are authorized by law and are not
set by statute:
(a) State park room rates;
(b) Prices for food in restaurants at state facilities;
Page 27 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
(c) Prices for goods at gift shops at state facilities;
(d) Prices for groceries and other items sold at state facilities;
(e) Prices charged for state publications;
(f) Prices charged for rides and amusement activities at state facilities;
(g) Admission fees to athletic and entertainment events at state facilities;
(h) Charges for swimming, skiing, horseback riding, and similar recreational
activities at state facilities;
(i) Charges for boat and equipment rentals for recreational purposes at state
facilities; and
(j) Admission fees charged for seminars and educational courses by state
administrative bodies;
(4) The procedures to be utilized by the administrative body in the conduct of hearings
by or for the administrative body unless such procedures are prescribed by a statute;
and
(5) The disciplinary procedures within the jurisdiction of the administrative body
unless such procedures are prescribed by statute.
Section 14. KRS 13A.315 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An administrative regulation shall expire and shall not be reviewed by a legislative
committee if:
(a) It has not been reviewed or approved by the official or administrative body
with authority to review or approve[, or it does not have a certification
required by KRS 13A.105(3)];
(b) The statement of consideration and, if applicable, the amended after
comments version are not filed on or before a deadline specified by this
chapter;
(c) The administrative body:
1. Has failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter governing the
Page 28 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2141
filing of administrative regulations, the public hearing and public
comment period, or the statement of consideration; or
2. Has failed to comply with KRS 13A.105; or
(d) The administrative regulation is deferred pursuant to KRS 13A.300(2) more
than twelve (12) times.
(2) (a) An administrative regulation that has been found deficient by a legislative
committee shall be withdrawn immediately if, pursuant to KRS 13A.330, the
Governor has determined that it shall be withdrawn.
(b) The Governor shall notify the regulations compiler in writing that he or she
has determined that the administrative regulation found deficient shall be
withdrawn.
(c) The written withdrawal of an administrative regulation governed by the
provisions of this subsection shall be made in a letter to the regulations
compiler in the following format: "Pursuant to KRS 13A.330, I have
determined that (administrative regulation number and title) shall be
(withdrawn, or withdrawn and amended to conform to the finding of
deficiency, as applicable). The administrative regulation, (administrative
regulation number and title), is hereby withdrawn."
(d) An administrative regulation governed by the provisions of this subsection
shall be considered withdrawn upon receipt by the regulations compiler of the
written withdrawal.
Page 29 of 29
XXXX 3/3/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed